Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
For article, “The Seizure of Property as Evidence, Its Unlawful Retention, and Suggested Remedies of the Owner,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 172 (1965).

For case note, “Search and Seizure — The Automobile Exception: Attempting to Establish a Bright-line Rule Regarding Searches of Passengers' Containers,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 585 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in state probation revocation proceedings, of evidence obtained through illegal search and seizure, 77 ALR3d 636.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of adult defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's minor child — state cases, 99 ALR3d 598.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by domestic employee or servant, 99 ALR3d 1232.

Concern for possible victim (rescue doctrine) as justifying violation of Miranda requirements, 9 ALR4th 595.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding search and seizure issues, 12 ALR4th 318.

Use, in attorney or physician disciplinary proceeding, of evidence obtained by wrongful police action, 20 ALR4th 546.

Employment of photographic equipment to record presence and nature of items as constituting unreasonable search, 27 ALR4th 532.

Search and seizure: suppression of evidence found in automobile during routine check of vehicle identification number (VIN), 27 ALR4th 549.

Admissibility, in criminal case, of evidence discovered by warrantless search in connection with fire investigation — post-Tyler cases, 31 ALR4th 194.

Propriety in state prosecution of severance of partially valid search warrant and limitation of suppression to items seized under invalid portions of warrant, 32 ALR4th 378.

Validity, in state criminal trial, of arrest without warrant by identified peace officer outside of jurisdiction, when not in fresh pursuit, 34 ALR4th 328.

Validity of routine roadblocks by state or local police for purpose of discovery of vehicular or driving violations, 37 ALR4th 10.

Retailer's surveillance of fitting or dressing rooms as invasion of privacy, 38 ALR4th 954.

Validity of, and admissibility of evidence discovered in, search authorized by judge over telephone, 38 ALR4th 1145.

Search and seizure: what constitutes abandonment of personal property within rule that search and seizure of abandoned property is not unreasonable — modern cases, 40 ALR4th 381.

Admissibility, in criminal case, of physical evidence obtained without consent by surgical removal from person's body, 41 ALR4th 60.

Propriety of governmental eavesdropping on communications between accused and his attorney, 44 ALR4th 841.

Validity of arrest made in reliance upon uncorrected or outdated warrant, list or similar police record, 45 ALR4th 550.

Officer's ruse to gain entry as affecting admissibility of plain-view evidence — modern cases, 47 ALR4th 425.

Necessity that police obtain warrant before taking possession of, examining or testing evidence discovered in search by private person, 47 ALR4th 501.

Eavesdropping on extension telephone as invasion of privacy, 49 ALR4th 430.

Propriety of state or local government health officer's warrantless search — post-Camara cases, 53 ALR4th 1168.

Seizure of books, documents or other papers under search warrant not describing such items, 54 ALR4th 391.

Search and seizure: reasonable expectation of privacy in public restroom, 74 ALR4th 508.

Search and seizure of telephone company records pertaining to subscriber as violation of subscriber's constitutional rights, 76 ALR4th 536.

“Caller ID” system, allowing telephone call recipient to ascertain number of telephone from which call originated, as violation of right to privacy, wiretapping statute, or similar protections, 9 ALR5th 553.

Lawfulness of search of person or personal effects under medical emergency exception to warrant requirement, 11 ALR5th 52.

Prisoner's rights as to search and seizure under state law or constitution—Post-Hudson cases, 14 ALR5th 913.

State constitutional requirements as to exclusion of evidence unlawfully seized—Post-Leon cases, 19 ALR5th 470.

Search and seizure: Lawfulness of demand for driver's license, vehicle registration, or proof of insurance pursuant to police stop to assist motorist, 19 ALR5th 884.

Admissibility, in motor vehicle license suspension proceedings, of evidence obtained by unlawful search and seizure, 23 ALR5th 108.

Search conducted by school official or teacher as violation of fourth amendment or equivalent state constitutional provision, 31 ALR5th 229.

Search and seizure of bank records pertaining to customer as violation of customer's rights under state law, 33 ALR5th 453.

Sufficiency of description in warrant of person to be searched, 43 ALR5th 1.

Application of “plain-feel” exception to warrant requirements — state cases, 50 ALR5th 581.

Propriety of search of nonoccupant visitor's belongings pursuant to warrant issued for another's premises, 51 ALR5th 375.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of adult defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's minor child — state cases, 51 ALR5th 425.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's adult relative other than spouse — state cases, 55 ALR5th 125.

Observation through binoculars as constituting unreasonable search, 59 ALR5th 615.

Search and seizure: reasonable expectation of privacy in driveways, 60 ALR5th 1.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in warrantless search of rental property authorized by lessor of such property — state cases, 61 ALR5th 1.

Searches and seizures: reasonable expectation of privacy in contents of garbage or trash receptacle, 62 ALR5th 1.

Belief that burglary is in progress or has recently been committed as exigent circumstance justifying warrantless search of premises, 64 ALR5th 637.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's spouse (resident or nonresident) — state cases, 65 ALR5th 407.

Search and seizure: reasonable expectation of privacy in tent or campsite, 66 ALR5th 373.

Validity of anticipatory search warrants — state cases, 67 ALR5th 361.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by one, other than relative, who is cotenant or common resident with defendant — state cases, 68 ALR5th 343.

Civilian participation in execution of search warrant as affecting legality of search, 68 ALR5th 549.

Effect of retroactive consent on legality of otherwise unlawful search and seizure, 76 ALR5th 563.

Permissibility and sufficiency of warrantless use of thermal imager or Forward Looking Infra-Red Radar (F.L.I.R.), 78 ALR5th 309.

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of illegal narcotics violations, 82 ALR5th 103.

Validity of search or seizure of computer, computer disk, or computer peripheral equipment, 84 ALR5th 1.

What constitutes compliance with knock-and-announce rule in search of private premises — State cases, 85 ALR5th 1.

Federal and state constitutions as protecting prison visitor against unreasonable searches and seizures, 85 ALR5th 261.

Constitutionality of secret video surveillance, 91 ALR5th 585.

Expectation of privacy in internet communications, 92 ALR5th 15.

Validity of requirement that, as condition of probation, defendant submit to warrantless searches, 99 ALR5th 557.

Error, in either search warrant or application for warrant, as to address of place to be searched as rendering warrant invalid, 103 ALR5th 463.

Search warrant as authorizing search of structures on property other than main house or other building, or location other than designated portion of building, 104 ALR5th 165.

Admissibility, in civil proceeding, of evidence obtained through unlawful search and seizure, 105 ALR5th 1.

Odor detectable by unaided person as furnishing probable cause for search warrant, 106 ALR5th 397.

When are facts offered in support of search warrant for evidence of sale or possession of cocaine so untimely as to be stale — State cases,109 ALR5th 99.

When are facts offered in support of search warrant for evidence of sexual offense so untimely as to be stale — State cases,111 ALR5th 239.

When are facts relating to marijuana, provided by one other than police or other law enforcement officer, so untimely as to be stale when offered in support of search warrant for evidence of sale or possession of a controlled substance — State cases,112 ALR5th 429.

When are facts relating to drug other than cocaine or marijuana so untimely as to be stale when offered in support of search warrant for evidence of sale or possession of controlled substance — State cases,113 ALR5th 517.

Validity of warrantless search of motor vehicle based on odor of marijuana — State cases, 114 ALR5th 173.

When are facts relating to marijuana, provided by police or other law enforcement officer, so untimely as to be stale when offered in support of search warrant for evidence of sale or possession of controlled substance—State cases, 114 ALR5th 235.

Validity of warrantless search based in whole or in part on odor of narcotics other than marijuana, or chemical related to manufacture of such narcotics, 115 ALR5th 477.

Validity of routine roadblocks by state or local police for purpose of discovery of driver's license, registration, and safety violations, 116 ALR5th 479.

Use of trained dog to detect narcotics or drugs as unreasonable search in violation of state constitutions, 117 ALR5th 407.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding search and seizure issues-Motions and objections during trial and matters other than pretrial motions, 117 ALR5th 513.

Validity of warrantless search of other than motor vehicle or occupant of vehicle based on odor of marijuana — State cases, 122 ALR 5th 439.

Validity of warrantless search of motor vehicle driver based on odor of marijuana — State cases, 123 ALR 5th 179.

Validity of search conducted pursuant to parole warrant, 123 ALR 5th 221.

Validity of warrantless search of motor vehicle passenger based on odor of marijuana, 1 A.L.R.6th 371.

Application of Leon good faith exception to exclusionary rule where police fail to comply with knock and announce requirement during execution of search warrant, 2 A.L.R.6th 169.

Application in state narcotics cases of collective knowledge doctrine or fellow officers' rule under Fourth Amendment—Cocaine cases, 4 A.L.R.6th 599.

Employee's expectation of privacy in workplace. 18 A.L.R.6th 1.

Expectation of privacy in text transmissions to or from pager, cellular telephone, or other wireless personal communications device. 25 A.L.R.6th 201.

Timeliness of execution of search warrant. 27 A.L.R.6th 491.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's relative, 48 ALR Fed 131.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in warrantless search of property or premises authorized by one having ownership interest in property or premises other than relative, 49 ALR Fed 511.

Sufficiency of description of business records under Fourth Amendment requirement of particularity in federal warrant authorizing search and seizure, 53 ALR Fed 679.

Validity, under federal constitution, of search conducted as condition of entering public building, 53 ALR Fed 888.

Aerial observation or surveillance as violative of fourth amendment guaranty against unreasonable search and seizure, 56 ALR Fed 772.

Attachment or use of transponder (beeper) to monitor location of airplane or automobile as constituting “search” within fourth amendment, 57 ALR Fed 646.

Validity, under fourth amendment, of “mail cover,” 57 ALR Fed 742.

Propriety of monitoring of telephone calls to or from prison inmates under Title III of Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act (18 USC § 2510 et seq.) prohibiting judicially unauthorized interception of wire or oral communications, 61 ALR Fed 825.

Delay in sealing or failure to seal tape or wire recording as required by 18 USC § 2518(8)(a) as ground for suppression of such recording at trial, 62 ALR Fed 636.

Propriety of search involving removal of natural substance or foreign object from body by actual or threatened force, 66 ALR Fed 119.

Interception of telecommunication by or with consent of party as exception, under 18 USC § 2511(2)(c) and (d), to federal proscription of such interceptions, 67 ALR Fed 429.

Admissibility of evidence obtained by unconstitutional search in proceedings under Occupational Safety and Health Act (29 USC § 651 et seq.), 67 ALR Fed 724.

When do facts shown as probable cause for wiretap authorization under 18 USC § 2518(3) become “stale,” 68 ALR Fed 953.

Propriety in federal prosecution of severance of partially valid search warrant and limitation of suppression to items seized under invalid portions of warrant, 69 ALR Fed 522.

Fourth amendment as protecting prison visitor against unreasonable searches and seizures, 69 ALR Fed 856.

What claims are sufficient to require government, pursuant to 18 USC § 3504, to affirm or deny use of unlawful electronic surveillance, 70 ALR Fed 67.

Use of electronic tracking device (beeper) to monitor location of object or substance other than vehicle or aircraft as constituting search violating fourth amendment, 70 ALR Fed 747.

Admissibility, in trial for federal offense involving malicious use of explosives (under 18 USC § 844), of evidence of taggants embedded in explosives, 70 ALR Fed 906.

What constitutes “an opportunity for full and fair litigation” in state court precluding habeas corpus review under 28 USC § 2254 in federal court of state prisoner's fourth amendment claims, 75 ALR Fed 9.

Fourth amendment as prohibiting strip searches of arrestees or pretrial detainees, 78 ALR Fed 201.

Validity of warrantless search under extended border doctrine, 102 ALR Fed 269.

Warrantless detention of mail for investigative purposes as violative of fourth amendment, 115 ALR Fed 439.

Permissibility under fourth amendment of detention of motorist by police, following lawful stop for traffic offense, to investigate matters not related to offense, 118 ALR Fed 567.

What circumstances fall within public safety exception to general requirement, pursuant to or as aid in enforcement of federal constitution's Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination, to give Miranda warnings before conducting custodial interrogation — post-Quarles cases, 142 ALR Fed 229.

When is consent voluntarily given so as to justify search conducted on basis of that consent — Supreme Court cases, 148 ALR Fed 271.

Use of trained dog to detect narcotics or drugs as unreasonable search in violation of fourth amendment, 150 ALR Fed 399.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of adult defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's minor relative 152 ALR Fed 475.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's spouse 154 ALR Fed 579.

Admissibility of evidence discovered in search of defendant's property or residence authorized by defendant's adult relative other than spouse, 160 ALR Fed 165.

Sufficiency of information provided by anonymous informant to provide probable cause for Federal search warrant — cases decided after Illinois v. Gates, 462 U.S. 213, 103 S. Ct. 2317, 76 L. Ed. 2d 527, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 54 (U.S.), reh'g denied, 463 U.S. 1237, 104 S. Ct. 33, 77 L. Ed. 2d 1453, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 884 (U.S. 1983).

Validity of warrantless administrative inspection of business that is allegedly closely or pervasively regulated; cases decided since Colonnade Catering Corp. v. United States, 397 U.S. 72, 90 S. Ct. 774, 25 L. Ed. 2d 60, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 66 (U.S. 1970), limited, Dunlop v. Hertzler Enterprises, Inc., 418 F. Supp. 627, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13579 (D.N.M. 1976), limited, United States v. Device, Labeled "Theramatic", 641 F.2d 1289, 1981 U.S. App. LEXIS 18799 (9th Cir. Haw. 1981).

When are facts offered in support of search warrant for evidence of federal nondrug offense so untimely as to be stale,187 ALR Fed 415.

Validity of warrantless search of motor vehicle based on odor of marijuana — Federal cases, 188 ALR Fed 487.

Validity of warrantless search of other than motor vehicle or occupant of motor vehicle based on odor of marijuana — Federal cases, 191 ALR Fed 303.

Validity of warrantless search of motor vehicle occupant based on odor of marijuana — Federal cases, 192 ALR Fed 391.

Sufficiency of information provided by confidential informant, whose identity is known to police, to provide probable cause for federal search warrant where there was indication that informant provided reliable information to police in past — Cases decided after Illinois v. Gates, 462 U.S. 213, 103 S. Ct. 2317, 76 L. Ed. 2d 527, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 54 (U.S.), reh'g denied, 463 U.S. 1237, 104 S. Ct. 33, 77 L. Ed. 2d 1453, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 884 (U.S. 1983).